Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
Article 1 General Provisions

45-15-1.
Election.

There shall be an Attorney General of the state who shall be elected at the same time, for the same term, and in the same manner as the Governor.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 341; Code 1868, § 402; Code 1873, § 367; Code 1882, § 367; Civil Code 1895, § 219; Civil Code 1910, § 253; Code 1933, § 40-1601.

45-15-2.
Compensation.

The Attorney General shall be compensated in the amount and manner provided in Code Sections 45-7-3 and 45-7-4. He shall also be reimbursed for actual transportation costs while traveling by public carrier, the legal mileage rate for use of a personal automobile, and the actual cost of lodging and meals while away from his office on official state business as provided in Code Section 45-7-20.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 131, § 2; Ga. L. 1966, p. 165, § 1; Ga. L. 1967, p. 101, § 1; Ga. L. 1970, p. 15, § 1.

Cross references.

Legal mileage allowance, §

50-19-7

.

45-15-3.
Duties generally.

It is the duty of the Attorney General:

When required to do so by the Governor, to give his opinion in writing, or otherwise, on any question of law connected with the interest of the state or with the duties of any of the departments;

When he deems it advisable, to prepare all contracts and writings in relation to any matter in which the state is interested;

When required to do so by the Governor, to participate in, on behalf of the state, all criminal actions in any court of competent jurisdiction when the district attorney thereof is being prosecuted, and all other criminal or civil actions to which the state is a party;

To act as the legal adviser of the executive branch;

To represent the state in all capital felony actions before the Supreme Court;

To represent the state in all civil actions tried in any court; and

To perform such other services as shall be required of him by law.

History.

Laws 1799, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 574; Code 1863, § 343; Code 1868, § 404; Ga. L. 1873, p. 31, § 1; Code 1873, § 369; Code 1882, § 369; Civil Code 1895, § 220; Penal Code 1895, § 880; Civil Code 1910, § 254; Penal Code 1910, § 901; Code 1933, § 40-1602; Ga. L. 1975, p. 882, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 415, § 45.

Cross references.

Duty of Attorney General to represent beneficiaries of charitable trusts, §

53-12-174

.

Law reviews.

For note, “Perdue v. Baker: Who Has the Ultimate Power over Litigation on Behalf of the State of Georgia — the Governor or the Attorney General?,” see
21 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 751 (2005).

45-15-4.
Attorney General authorized to employ private counsel.

The Attorney General, upon the request of any department, office, officer, institution, commission, committee, board, or other agency of any branch of the government of the state or any instrumentality thereof, is authorized to select and employ private counsel to perform legal services for such department, office, officer, institution, commission, committee, board, or other agency of any branch of the government of the state or any instrumentality thereof.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, p. 98, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1184, § 1.

45-15-5.
Payment for services of private counsel.

Any department, office, officer, institution, commission, committee, board, or other agency of any branch of the government of the state or any instrumentality thereof is authorized and directed to pay for the legal services requested pursuant to Code Section 45-15-4, upon approval by the Attorney General of the charge for such services.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, p. 98, § 2; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1184, § 2.

45-15-6.
Representation of state in court of competent jurisdiction.

When the services of the Attorney General are needed in any court of competent jurisdiction, the presiding judge thereof shall notify the Governor 20 days before of the time, place, and cause; and the Governor may, in his discretion, order the Attorney General to represent the state.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 344; Code 1868, § 405; Code 1873, § 370; Code 1882, § 370; Civil Code 1895, § 221; Civil Code 1910, § 255; Code 1933, § 40-1603; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 45.

45-15-7.
Discretion of comptroller general as to requirement of services of Attorney General or of district attorneys.

When the services of a district attorney are necessary in collecting or securing any claim of the state in any part of the state, the comptroller general may, in his discretion, require the Attorney General to command the services of the Department of Law or of the district attorneys in their respective circuits in such cases.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 345; Code 1868, § 406; Code 1873, § 371; Code 1882, § 371; Civil Code 1895, § 222; Civil Code 1910, § 256; Code 1933, § 40-1604; Ga. L. 2013, p. 141, § 45/HB 79.

45-15-8.
Performance of legal services for Western & Atlantic Railroad.

The Governor is authorized to require the Attorney General to perform such legal services as may be necessary for the Western & Atlantic Railroad without compensation other than his official salary.

History.

Ga. L. 1902, p. 97, § 1; Civil Code 1910, § 257; Code 1933, § 40-1605.

45-15-9.
Representation of state in United States Supreme Court and beyond state limits.

The Attorney General shall represent the state in all actions before the Supreme Court of the United States and perform all other services required of him by law beyond the limits of the state without extra compensation.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 134, § 2; Code 1933, § 40-1606.

Law reviews.

For note, “Perdue v. Baker: Who Has the Ultimate Power over Litigation on Behalf of the State of Georgia — the Governor or the Attorney General?,” see
21 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 751 (2005).

45-15-10.
Attorney General authorized to prosecute for violations while dealing with or for state; assistance by state court prosecuting officers; commencement of civil forfeiture proceedings.

The Attorney General, as the head of the Department of Law and the chief legal officer of the state, is authorized to prosecute in the criminal courts of this state any official, person, firm, or corporation which violates any criminal statute while dealing with or for the state or any official, employee, department, agency, board, bureau, commission, institution, or appointee thereof; and the Attorney General is authorized to call upon the district attorney or the prosecuting officer of any state court to assist in or to conduct such prosecution; and, when so requested by the Attorney General, it shall be the duty of any such district attorney or prosecuting officer of this state to assist in or to conduct such prosecution for and on behalf of the Attorney General and the state. The Attorney General shall be authorized to commence civil forfeiture proceedings, as such term is defined in Code Section 9-16-2, pursuant to Code Section 16-14-7 whenever he or she is authorized to prosecute a case pursuant to this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 284, § 6; Ga. L. 2002, p. 415, § 45; Ga. L. 2015, p. 693, § 3-26/HB 233.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, added the last sentence in this Code section. See editor’s note for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 693, § 4-1/HB 233, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2015, and shall apply to seizures of property for forfeiture that occur on or after that date.
Any such seizure that occurs before July 1, 2015, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such seizure.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (2015).

45-15-11.
Notification of Attorney General prior to presenting indictment to grand jury charging state officials.

Before an indictment charging any state official with violating subsection (b) of Code Section 45-11-4 is presented to a grand jury, the district attorney of the county where the grand jury will convene shall notify the Attorney General of such contemplated action.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 284, § 7; Ga. L. 2001, p. 487, § 4.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2001, p. 487, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Corruption Prevention Act.’ ”

Ga. L. 2001, p. 487, § 6, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the provisions of Sections 3 and 4 of the Act shall apply to crimes committed before, on, and after April 20, 2001.

Law reviews.

For article, “Georgia Local Government Officials and the Grand Jury,” see 26 Ga. St. B.J. 50 (1989).

For article, “Local Government Law,” see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 389 (2001).

45-15-12.
Attorney General authorized to prosecute civil recovery actions for violations while dealing with state or officials, employees, or entities thereof.

The Attorney General, as the head of the Department of Law and the chief legal officer of the state, is authorized to file and prosecute civil recovery actions in the name of the state against any person, firm, or corporation which violates any statute while dealing with the state or any official, employee, department, agency, board, bureau, commission, institution, or authority thereof, which violation results in loss, damage, or injury to the state or to any of its departments, adjuncts, or taxpayers.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 284, § 8.

45-15-13.
Representation of state authorities by Attorney General.

As used in Code Sections 45-15-14 through 45-15-16, the term “state authorities” means the following instrumentalities of the state: Georgia Building Authority, Georgia Education Authority (Schools), Georgia Education Authority (University), Georgia Highway Authority, Georgia Ports Authority, State Road and Tollway Authority, Jekyll Island-State Park Authority, Stone Mountain Memorial Association, Georgia Emergency Communications Authority, and Savannah-Georgia Convention Center Authority.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 484, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1251, § 2-1; Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 45/HB 942; Ga. L. 2014, p. 866, § 45/SB 340; Ga. L. 2018, p. 689, § 3-3/HB 751; Ga. L. 2019, p. 285, § 2/HB 525.

The 2014 amendment,

effective April 29, 2014, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, deleted “Georgia Building Authority (Hospital), Georgia Building Authority (Markets),” following “Georgia Building Authority,” near the beginning.

The 2018 amendment,

effective January 1, 2019, deleted “and” preceding “Stone Mountain”, and added “, and Georgia Emergency Communications Authority”. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2019 amendment

deleted “and” preceding “Georgia Emergency Communications Authority” near the end, and added “, and Savannah-Georgia Convention Center Authority” at the end. See Editor’s notes for effective date.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2018, p. 689, § 4-1/HB 751, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “(b) The provisions of this Act shall not in any manner diminish, extinguish, reduce, or affect any cause of action for audits, services, or the recovery of funds from service providers which may have existed prior to January 1, 2019.
Any such cause of action is expressly preserved.”

Ga. L. 2019, p. 285, § 4/HB 525, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval for the sole purpose of appointing the initial members of the authority. The Act shall become effective for all other purposes on July 1, 2019.” This Act was signed by the Governor on April 28, 2019.

45-15-14.
Exclusive authority in law matters; employment of other counsel by state authorities; designation and assignment of assistant attorneys general to perform legal services for authorities.

The Attorney General is vested with complete and exclusive authority and jurisdiction in all matters of law relating to state authorities and no such state authority shall be authorized without the approval of the Attorney General to employ other counsel in any matter whatsoever. The Attorney General is authorized to designate and assign any assistant attorney general, deputy assistant attorney general, special deputy assistant attorney general, or attorney to perform legal services for any such state authority.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 484, § 2.

45-15-15.
Attorney General to submit statement to state authority for legal services; contents; advance approval of state authority director.

From time to time the Attorney General shall submit to the state authority requesting legal services a statement of the expenses of such legal services incurred by the Department of Law, such statements to include the names of the assistant attorneys general, deputy assistant attorneys general, special deputy assistant attorneys general, or attorneys performing such services; the items of legal services performed; and the costs thereof. The state authority is authorized to reimburse the Department of Law for such services and expenses; provided, however, that the amount of such services and expenses shall have the advance approval of the director of the state authority requesting such services.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 484, § 4; Ga. L. 2002, p. 462, § 45.

45-15-16.
State authority to reimburse department for legal services.

When the Attorney General shall assign any assistant attorney general, deputy assistant attorney general, special deputy assistant attorney general, or attorney to perform specific legal services requested by any state authority or legal service requested in connection with the validation of any bonds issued or to be issued by any state authority, the state authority requesting such services shall reimburse the Department of Law for such services as provided in Code Section 45-15-15.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 484, § 3.

45-15-17.
Power to conduct investigations generally; issuance and enforcement of subpoenas.

The Attorney General, as head of the Department of Law and as chief legal officer of the state, is authorized to institute and conduct investigations at any time into the affairs of the state; or of any department, board, bureau, commission, institution, authority, instrumentality, retirement system, or other agency of the state; or into the affairs of any person or organization to the extent that such person or organization shall have or shall have had any dealings with the state or any department, board, bureau, commission, institution, authority, instrumentality, retirement system, or other agency of the state.

For the purpose of conducting any investigation as provided in this Code section, the Attorney General shall have the power to administer oaths; to call any party to testify under oath at such investigations; to require the attendance of witnesses and the production of books, records, and papers; and to take the depositions of witnesses. For such purposes the Attorney General is authorized to issue a subpoena for any witness or a subpoena to compel the production of any books, records, or papers.

In case of refusal to obey a subpoena issued under this Code section to any person and upon application by the Attorney General, the superior court in whose jurisdiction the witness is to appear or in which the books, records, or papers are to be produced may issue to that person an order requiring him to appear before the court to show cause why he should not be held in contempt for refusal to obey the subpoena. Failure to obey a subpoena may be punished by the court as contempt of court.

Nothing contained in this Code section shall authorize the Attorney General to commence or carry on any investigation or to issue any subpoenas to anyone for the purpose of investigating any member of the General Assembly while the General Assembly is in any regular or called session.

As used in this subsection, “peace officer” shall have the same meaning as provided for in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (8) of Code Section 35-8-2.

For the purposes of this Code section, the Attorney General shall have the authority to employ peace officers who shall be authorized to execute all powers of a peace officer.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 284, § 5; Ga. L. 1975, p. 883, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 45; Ga. L. 2020, p. 29, § 2/SB 394.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, added subsection (e).

45-15-18.
Governor may direct Attorney General to conduct investigations of departments, state officials or employees or entities dealing with state; prosecution of actions; appointment of special attorney general.

The Governor may at any time direct the Attorney General to conduct an investigation into the affairs of any department of the state or into the official conduct of any state official or employee or into the affairs of any person, firm, or corporation dealing with the state. The Governor may at any time direct the Attorney General to file and prosecute criminal actions and civil recovery actions in the name of the state against any official, person, firm, or corporation which violates any criminal or civil statute while dealing with or for the state, which violation results in loss, damage, or injury to the state. In the event the Attorney General refuses to take or file such action within a reasonable time after having been directed by the Governor to do so, the Governor is authorized to appoint a special attorney general to carry out the requirements of law provided in this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 284, § 9.

45-15-19.
Governor and General Assembly authorized to make investigations; designation of district attorney to act for state in action against Attorney General.

In addition to the power conferred upon the Attorney General in this article, the Governor or the General Assembly is authorized likewise to make investigations, including investigations of the Department of Law or the offices of the Attorney General or any agency under his control, and all authority and rights granted to the Governor and the General Assembly shall be as complete and absolute as those granted to the Attorney General. In any civil or criminal action against the Attorney General, the Governor shall designate a district attorney who shall be authorized, in such case, to act for the state.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 284, § 10.

Cross references.

Issuance of subpoenas by Superior Court of Fulton County on behalf of the Committees on Ethics of the Senate and House of Representatives, §

28-1-16

.

45-15-20.
Charge, demand, or receipt by Attorney General of fee, perquisite, or compensation other than salary in case where state interested.

If the Attorney General shall charge, demand, or receive any fee, perquisite, or compensation, other than his salary, in any case in which the state shall be a party or in any manner interested, he shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than two nor more than 20 years, shall be removed from office, and shall be forever disqualified from holding any office in this state.

History.

Ga. L. 1878-79, p. 157, §§ 1, 2; Code 1882, § 4508a; Penal Code 1895, § 300; Penal Code 1910, § 304; Code 1933, § 40-9901.